Utah statutes.
75-3-617.   Special administrator -- Formal proceedings -- Power and duties.

A special administrator appointed by order of the court in any formal proceeding has the power of a general personal representative except as limited in the appointment and duties as prescribed in the order. The appointment may be for a specified time, to perform particular acts, or on other terms as the court may direct.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

